Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 67.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-167
Complaint.

(RULLCA 904) In a derivative action under
section 21-165, the complaint must state with particularity:

(1) the date and content
of the plaintiff's demand and the response to the demand by the managers or
other members; or

(2)
if a demand has not been made, the reasons a demand under subdivision (1)
of section 21-165 would be futile.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 67.